Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 4 Merit System
36-4-51.
Running for elective office by classified employee. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

No member of the personnel appeal board shall seek the nomination of or be a candidate for any elective state office.

A classified employee, whose position is not fully funded through federal loans and/or grants, may seek the nomination of or be a candidate for elective state office in the state of Rhode Island. Provided, however, if the classified employee is elected to state office, the employee must resign or terminate his or her classified employee position prior to assuming or holding any state elective office in the state of Rhode Island.

A state elective officer may be appointed a classified employee or a member of the personnel appeal board, but only after resigning the officer’s elective office.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 21; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-51

; P.L. 1980, ch. 365, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 172, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 173, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

36-4-52.
Restrictions on political activities of classified employees.

No classified employee shall during working hours engage to any extent in any form of partisan politics except that he or she may attend and vote at any party caucus, primary, or election held during working hours. Outside of working hours a classified employee may attend any partisan political rally, club, or gathering and privately express his or her partisan political views but any further partisan political activity on his or her part shall be engaged in only in accordance with the personnel rules. A classified employee violating the provisions of §§

36-4-50

—

36-4-54

, or of the personnel rules shall for a first offense be either demoted or dismissed and for a second offense dismissed. All charges of these violations shall be publicly heard by the personnel appeal board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 21; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-52

.

36-4-53.
Solicitation of political contributions.

No classified employee or member of the personnel appeal board shall solicit contributions for nor shall he or she be solicited to contribute to any political party or campaign. Every officer, agent, clerk, or employee under the government of the state who may have charge or control in any building, office, or room occupied for any purpose of the state government is hereby authorized to prohibit the entry of any person, and he or she shall not permit any person to enter the building, office, or room, for the purpose of therein making, collecting, receiving, or giving notice of any political assessment, subscription, or contribution, and no person shall enter or remain in that building, office, or room, or send or direct any letter or other notice thereto, for the purpose of giving notice of, demanding, or collecting a political assessment, subscription, or contribution, nor shall any person therein give notice of, demand, collect, receive, or pay the assessment, subscription, or contribution contrary to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 21; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-53

.

36-4-54.
Promise of influence to obtain favors in classified service.

No person who is a candidate for nomination or for election for any elective office shall seek to influence the vote of any person by promising to use political influence in obtaining for that person an appointment or promotion in the classified service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 21; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-54

.

36-4-55 — 36-4-55.2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 22; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-55

; P.L. 1984, ch. 285, §§ 1, 2; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 195, § 2, effective June 25, 1987. For present provisions of law, see chapter 14 of this title.

36-4-56.
Penalties for violations.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter or chapter 3 of this title, or of the rules established in accordance with these chapters, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or be imprisoned for not more than sixty (60) days or both. Any person holding a position in the classified service so convicted shall be dismissed from the service immediately.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 28; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-56

; P.L. 1981, ch. 335, § 2.

36-4-57.
Compliance with federal standards.

The provisions of this chapter, chapter 3 of this title, or of the personnel rules shall not apply in each instance where it is contrary to merit standards established by the federal government or any agency of the state where compliance with the merit standards is a condition precedent to the granting of federal funds to the state or any agency of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-57

.

36-4-58.
Severability.

The provisions of this chapter and chapter 3 of this title shall be severable, and if any of the provisions shall be held to be invalid, the decision of the court respecting the provision or provisions shall not affect the validity of any other provisions which can be given effect without the invalid provisions. It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that this chapter and chapter 3 would have been adopted by the general assembly had the invalid provisions not been included in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 661, § 29; P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

36-4-58

.

36-4-59.
Tenure in state service.

Every person who shall have twenty (20) years, not necessarily consecutive, of service credit, the credits having been earned in either the classified, nonclassified, or unclassified service of the state or a combination of both, shall be deemed to have acquired full status in the position he or she holds at the time of obtaining twenty (20) years of service credit.

For any other position he or she may hold subsequent to the time of obtaining twenty (20) years of service credit, the person, subject to a then existing list, is to be deemed to have acquired full status in the subsequent position and shall be protected by the provisions of this chapter, provided, however:

That military service not to exceed four (4) years of active service shall constitute service credit within the meaning of this section;

That in case of layoff or the abolition of a position through reorganization or otherwise, any person in that position or subject to layoff, who has full status, otherwise qualified under this section, shall be retained within the state services in a position of similar grade;

That this section shall not apply to employees of the state government whose method of appointment and salary and term of office is specified by statute;

That all employees otherwise qualified under this section shall be subject to all of the provisions of dismissal and appeal as elsewhere described in this chapter.

This section shall not apply to those employees whose base entry date is after August 7, 1996.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 202, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 394, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 58, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 483, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 545, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 501, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 366, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 326, § 4.

36-4-60.
Delegation by appointing authority.

Whenever under the provisions of this chapter any action is permitted or required to be done by an appointing authority, the appointing authority may delegate the responsibility for the performance of that action to such subordinate officers or employees as he or she may see fit; provided, however, that no authority to discharge or otherwise terminate or suspend an employee shall be delegated to a subordinate officer or employee unless the subordinate officer or employee has previously been delegated the authority to hire or appoint employees of category similar to that employee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 272, § 1.

36-4-61.
Persons with disabilities — Special list of eligibles.

The personnel administrator is authorized and empowered to prepare without examination special lists of eligible persons who have a severe physical and/or mental impairment and who are certified by the department of human services as being so impaired, capable, and adequately trained to qualify for an entrance level class of positions in the classified service. The administrator, in his or her discretion, may fix the maximum number of persons who may be placed on the special lists of eligibles.

In order to qualify for permanent appointment to the classified service under subsection (a) of this section the person with a disability must:

Have a severe physical and/or mental impairment or combination of impairments which resulted in an inability to obtain permanent employment under competitive rules;

Have successfully demonstrated an ability to do a job under temporary appointment, for a period of five (5) months prior to their appointment to probationary status in the classified service; and

Meet minimum qualification standards for the class of positions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 73, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 335, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 212, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 10.

36-4-62.
Pay incentive program.

There is hereby established a pay incentive program for all state employees except department heads, administrators, or any supervisors considered by the personnel administrator to be at the management level. Any state employee who submits recommendations or proposals to eliminate inefficiencies, duplication, or waste shall receive five percent (5%) of any savings realized up to a maximum of two thousand dollars ($2,000) which relate directly to the employee’s proposed change. The incentive pay shall be computed on the actual savings for a twelve (12) month period, the period to run from the time that the proposed change is instituted. The incentive pay shall be paid to the employee at the end of the twelve (12) month period in a lump sum from the budget account of the department that realized the savings and shall be in addition to the employee’s regular salary. Employees who qualify for the incentive pay shall receive the lump sum only for the first year’s savings and not for any subsequent years. The personnel administrator shall promulgate such rules as he or she may consider necessary, appropriate, or desirable to carry out the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 150, § 1.

36-4-63.
Sick leave and other leave — Effect of discharging upon overtime work and overtime compensation.

For each discharge with pay of three (3) consecutive days of sick leave, an employee’s appointing authority shall require a physician’s certificate or other evidence satisfactory to the appointing authority. Sick leave is hereby defined to mean a necessary absence or absences from duty due to an employee’s illness, injury, or exposure to contagious disease. In the event that the required evidence satisfactory to the appointing authority is not presented by the employee prior to or upon the conclusion of that leave, no payment of any compensation to which the employee would otherwise be entitled shall be made and the employee shall be considered for all purposes as having been absent without leave.

In any given pay period in the event that an employee discharges any sick leave or leave of a type referred to in subsection (a) of this section, either with pay or without pay, he or she shall be permitted to work overtime only after he or she has worked his or her full thirty-five (35) or forty (40) hours, whichever is appropriated for the job classification. This subsection shall also apply to leave without pay which is taken by an employee for purposes other than those purposes referred to in subsection (a) of this section excluding, specifically, planned vacation days, personal days, and leave for death in employee’s immediate family.

Overtime, for purposes of this section, shall mean the performance of hours of work in any work week which are in excess of an employee’s established work week schedule, or when requested by the employer. Hours which are paid for but not actually worked except planned vacation days, personal days, jury duty, and leave for death in the employee’s immediate family shall not be counted as hours worked nor shall they otherwise be used in computing overtime compensation.

The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall not be applicable to employees in the nonstandard category.

Notwithstanding other subsections of this section, an employee who is granted leave with or without pay for the purpose of fulfilling a military obligation shall be eligible to perform overtime work.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, it shall be unlawful for any state agency or any person or persons acting on behalf of the agency, to agree to, or enter into any agreement including a collective bargaining agreement or any amendment, modification, extension, or replacement thereof, whether verbal or written, which contains provisions that are inconsistent with the provisions of this section and the inconsistent provisions shall be null and void, whether the provisions result from agreement or the award of an arbitrator or arbitration panel under the provisions of chapter 11 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 245, art. XIX, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 46, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 383, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 558, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 258, § 1.

36-4-64.
Sick leave — Workers’ compensation.

Whenever an employee shall be absent from his or her duties and is awaiting workers’ compensation benefits, he or she shall be granted sick leave in an amount not to exceed his or her regular compensation.

Whenever an employee shall be absent from his or her duties and is receiving compensation as provided in the workers’ compensation laws, he or she shall be granted sick leave so that the total of his or her compensation as provided in the workers’ compensation laws and his or her deductions from sick leave shall not exceed eighty three and three tenths percent (83.3%) of his or her regular compensation. Deductions from accumulated credits shall be applied only to that part of his or her salary which is paid as an addition to workers’ compensation payments. Annual leave credits may be applied in the same manner. When the absence shall not be covered by sick leave or annual leave it shall be deemed to be leave without pay.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 397, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 9, § 1.

36-4-65.
Longevity benefits — Department of elementary and secondary education — Legislature.

Any person employed by the department of elementary and secondary education below pay grade 19 in other than faculty positions, on or before February 1, 1974, in the classified, unclassified, or nonclassified service, or who was a member of the body as constituted by §

22-1-1

or

22-2-1

, shall be eligible for longevity benefits, as defined in the personnel rules adopted in accordance with §

36-4-8

, upon employment in the nonclassified service within the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 559, § 1.